Hawaii statutes.
[§668A-3] Applicability; relation to other law.
(a) This chapter applies to actions for partition filed on or after
January 1, 2017.

(b) In any action for partition of real
property under chapter 668, the court shall determine whether the property is
heirs property. If the court determines that the property is heirs property,
the property shall be partitioned under this chapter, unless all the cotenants
agree otherwise in a record.

(c) This chapter supplements chapter 668 and,
if an action is governed by this chapter, supersedes provisions of chapter 668
that are inconsistent with this chapter. [L 2016, c 260, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next